Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-202]
Annual privacy notice to customers required. (a) A licensee shall provide
a clear and conspicuous notice to customers that accurately reflects its
privacy policies and practices not less than annually during the continuation
of the customer relationship. Annually means at least once in any period of
twelve consecutive months during which that relationship exists. A licensee
may define the twelve consecutive month period, but the licensee shall apply it
to the customer on a consistent basis.

(b) A
licensee shall not be required to provide an annual notice to a former
customer. A former customer is an individual with whom a licensee no longer
has a continuing relationship.

(c) If a
licensee is required under this section to deliver an annual privacy notice,
the licensee shall deliver it according to section 431:3A-206. [L 2001, c 220,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next